Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2008
Inheritance tax; estates for life and remainder appraised and apportioned; rules and regulations; furnish to county judge.

Bequests, devises, or transfers of property or any interest therein in trust or otherwise for the life of the legatee, devisee, or transferee, or for a term, and bequests, devises, and transfers of vested or contingent remainder interests in property shall be subject to the provisions of sections 77-2001 to 77-2007.04. Such property or interests therein shall be appraised at times and in the manner provided in sections 77-2018.01 to 77-2025 at what was the fair market value thereof at the time of the death of the decedent. The portion thereof allocable to the temporary estate and the portion thereof allocable to the vested remainder estate shall be computed in accordance with such regulations with respect thereto as the state Tax Commissioner, from time to time, shall promulgate and adopt, and the Tax Commissioner is hereby directed to promulgate and adopt, from time to time, and to furnish to each county judge regulations and tables with respect thereto, based upon sound actuarial principles and prevailing interest rates.

Laws 1901, c. 54, § 2, p. 415;

R.S.1913, § 6623;

C.S.1922, § 6154;

C.S.1929, § 77-2202;

R.S.1943, § 77-2008;

Laws 1953, c. 282, § 3, p. 915.

A testator may shift the burden of payment of inheritance taxes as between a life estate and remainder interests. Stuckey v. Rosenberg, 169 Neb. 557, 100 N.W.2d 526 (1960).